Florida, session 2026, SB1322.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (3), paragraph (a) of 28 subsection (5), paragraph (a) of subsection (9), paragraph (b) 29 of subsection (11), paragraph (a) of subsection (14), paragraph 30 (a) of subsection (15), subsection (17), paragraph (a) of 31 subsection (18), subsection (19), paragraph (a) of subsection 32 (20), paragraph (a) of subsection (21), and subsection (26) of 33 section 28.24, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 34 28.24âService charges.âThe clerk of the circuit court shall 35 charge for services rendered manually or electronically by the 36 clerkâs office in recording documents and instruments and in 37 performing other specified duties. These charges may not exceed 38 those specified in this section, except as provided in s. 39 28.345. 40 (2)âFor examining, comparing, correcting, verifying, and 41 certifying transcripts of record in appellate proceedings, 42 prepared by attorney for appellant or someone else other than 43 clerk, per page: 5.00, from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 per 44 page to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 45 Revenue Fund. 46 (3)âFor preparing, numbering, and indexing an original 47 record of appellate proceedings, per instrument: 3.50, from 48 which the clerk shall remit 0.50 per instrument to the 49 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 50 (5)(a)âFor verifying any instrument presented for 51 certification prepared by someone other than clerk, per page: 52 3.50, from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 per page to the 53 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 54 (9)(a)âFor writing any paper that is a court record other 55 than a paper otherwise specifically mentioned in this section, 56 including signing and sealing: 7.00, from which the clerk shall 57 remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 58 General Revenue Fund. 59 (11)âFor receiving money into the registry of court: 60 (b)âEminent domain actions, per deposit: 170.00, from which 61 the clerk shall remit 20.00 per deposit to the Department of 62 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 63 (14)(a)âOath, administering, attesting, and sealing of 64 court records not otherwise provided for in this section: 3.50, 65 from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 to the Department of 66 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 67 (15)(a)âFor validating certificates or any authorized bonds 68 that are court records, each: 3.50, from which the clerk shall 69 remit 0.50 each to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 70 the General Revenue Fund. 71 (17)âFor exemplified certificates, including the signing 72 and sealing of them: 7.00, from which the clerk shall remit 1.00 73 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 74 Revenue Fund. 75 (18)(a)âFor authenticated certificates that are court 76 records, including the signing and sealing of them: 7.00, from 77 which the clerk shall remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue 78 for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 79 (19)(a)âFor issuing and filing a subpoena for a witness, 80 not otherwise provided for in this section, including the 81 writing, preparing, signing, and sealing of it: 7.00, from which 82 the clerk shall remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue for 83 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 84 (b)âFor signing and sealing only: 2.00, from which the 85 clerk shall remit 0.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 86 into the General Revenue Fund. 87 (20)(a)âFor approving a court bond: 8.50, from which the 88 clerk shall remit 1.00 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 89 into the General Revenue Fund. 90 (21)(a)âFor searching court records, for each yearâs 91 search: 2.00, from which the clerk shall remit 0.50 for each 92 yearâs search to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 93 General Revenue Fund. 94 (26)âFor sealing any court file or expungement of any 95 record: 42.00, from which the clerk shall remit 4.50 to the 96 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 97 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) and 98 paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 28.241, Florida 99 Statutes, are amended to read: 100 28.241âFiling fees for trial and appellate proceedings.â 101 (1)âFiling fees are due at the time a party files a 102 pleading to initiate a proceeding or files a pleading for 103 relief. Reopen fees are due at the time a party files a pleading 104 to reopen a proceeding if at least 90 days have elapsed since 105 the filing of a final order or final judgment with the clerk. If 106 a fee is not paid upon the filing of the pleading as required 107 under this section, the clerk shall pursue collection of the fee 108 pursuant to s. 28.246. 109 (a)1.a.âExcept as provided in sub-subparagraph b. and 110 subparagraph 2., the party instituting any civil action, suit, 111 or proceeding in the circuit court shall pay to the clerk of 112 that court a filing fee of up to $395 in all cases in which 113 there are not more than five defendants and an additional filing 114 fee of up to $2.50, from which the clerk shall remit $0.50 to 115 the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue 116 Fund, for each defendant in excess of five. Of the first $200 in 117 filing fees, $195 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue 118 for deposit into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 must be 119 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 120 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 121 Services and used to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks 122 of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must 123 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 124 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 125 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 126 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services. 127 b.âThe party instituting any civil action, suit, or 128 proceeding in the circuit court under chapter 39, chapter 61, 129 chapter 741, chapter 742, chapter 747, chapter 752, or chapter 130 753 shall pay to the clerk of that court a filing fee of up to 131 $295 in all cases in which there are not more than five 132 defendants and an additional filing fee of up to $2.50 for each 133 defendant in excess of five. Of the first $100 in filing fees, 134 $95 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit 135 into the State Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 must be remitted to 136 the Department of Revenue for deposit into the Administrative 137 Trust Fund within the Department of Financial Services and used 138 to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks of Court Operations 139 Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must be remitted to the 140 Department of Revenue for deposit into the Administrative Trust 141 Fund within the Department of Financial Services to fund audits 142 of individual clerksâ court-related expenditures conducted by 143 the Department of Financial Services. 144 c.âAn additional filing fee of $4 shall be paid to the 145 clerk. The clerk shall remit $3.50 to the Department of Revenue 146 for deposit into the Court Education Trust Fund and shall remit 147 50 cents to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 148 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 149 Services to fund clerk education provided by the Florida Clerks 150 of Court Operations Corporation. An additional filing fee of up 151 to $18 shall be paid by the party seeking each severance that is 152 granted, from which the clerk shall remit $3 to the Department 153 of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. The clerk 154 may impose an additional filing fee of up to $85, from which the 155 clerk shall remit $10 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 156 into the General Revenue Fund, for all proceedings of 157 garnishment, attachment, replevin, and distress. Postal charges 158 incurred by the clerk of the circuit court in making service by 159 certified or registered mail on defendants or other parties 160 shall be paid by the party at whose instance service is made. 161 Additional fees, charges, or costs may not be added to the 162 filing fees imposed under this section, except as authorized in 163 this section or by general law. 164 2.a.âNotwithstanding the fees prescribed in subparagraph 165 1., a party instituting a civil action in circuit court relating 166 to real property or mortgage foreclosure shall pay a graduated 167 filing fee based on the value of the claim. 168 b.âA party shall estimate in writing the amount in 169 controversy of the claim upon filing the action. For purposes of 170 this subparagraph, the value of a mortgage foreclosure action is 171 based upon the principal due on the note secured by the 172 mortgage, plus interest owed on the note and any moneys advanced 173 by the lender for property taxes, insurance, and other advances 174 secured by the mortgage, at the time of filing the foreclosure. 175 The value shall also include the value of any tax certificates 176 related to the property. In stating the value of a mortgage 177 foreclosure claim, a party shall declare in writing the total 178 value of the claim, as well as the individual elements of the 179 value as prescribed in this sub-subparagraph. 180 c.âIn its order providing for the final disposition of the 181 matter, the court shall identify the actual value of the claim. 182 The clerk shall adjust the filing fee if there is a difference 183 between the estimated amount in controversy and the actual value 184 of the claim and collect any additional filing fee owed or 185 provide a refund of excess filing fee paid. 186 d.âThe party shall pay a filing fee of: 187 (I)âThree hundred and ninety-five dollars in all cases in 188 which the value of the claim is $50,000 or less and in which 189 there are not more than five defendants. The party shall pay an 190 additional filing fee of up to $2.50 for each defendant in 191 excess of five. Of the first $200 in filing fees, $195 shall be 192 retained must be remitted by the clerk to the Department of 193 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, $4 must be 194 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 195 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 196 Services and used to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks 197 of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must 198 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 199 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 200 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 201 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services; 202 (II)âNine hundred dollars in all cases in which the value 203 of the claim is more than $50,000 but less than $250,000 and in 204 which there are not more than five defendants. The party shall 205 pay an additional filing fee of up to $2.50 for each defendant 206 in excess of five. Of the first $355 in filing fees, $350 shall 207 be retained must be remitted by the clerk to the Department of 208 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, $4 must be 209 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 210 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 211 Services and used to fund the contract with the Florida Clerks 212 of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 28.35, and $1 must 213 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 214 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 215 Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ court-related 216 expenditures conducted by the Department of Financial Services; 217 or 218 (III)âOne thousand nine hundred dollars in all cases in 219 which the value of the claim is $250,000 or more and in which 220 there are not more than five defendants. The party shall pay an 221 additional filing fee of up to $2.50 for each defendant in 222 excess of five. Of the first $1,705 in filing fees, $930 shall 223 be retained must be remitted by the clerk to the Department of 224 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, $770 must be 225 remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the State 226 Courts Revenue Trust Fund, $4 must be remitted to the Department 227 of Revenue for deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within 228 the Department of Financial Services to fund the contract with 229 the Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation created in s. 230 28.35, and $1 must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 231 deposit into the Administrative Trust Fund within the Department 232 of Financial Services to fund audits of individual clerksâ 233 court-related expenditures conducted by the Department of 234 Financial Services. 235 e.âAn additional filing fee of $4 shall be paid to the 236 clerk. The clerk shall remit $3.50 to the Department of Revenue 237 for deposit into the Court Education Trust Fund and shall remit 238 50 cents to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 239 Administrative Trust Fund within the Department of Financial 240 Services to fund clerk education provided by the Florida Clerks 241 of Court Operations Corporation. An additional filing fee of up 242 to $18 shall be paid by the party seeking each severance that is 243 granted. The clerk may impose an additional filing fee of up to 244 $85 for all proceedings of garnishment, attachment, replevin, 245 and distress. Postal charges incurred by the clerk of the 246 circuit court in making service by certified or registered mail 247 on defendants or other parties shall be paid by the party at 248 whose instance service is made. Additional fees, charges, or 249 costs may not be added to the filing fees imposed under this 250 section, except as authorized in this section or by general law. 251 (b)âA party reopening any civil action, suit, or proceeding 252 in the circuit court shall pay to the clerk of court a filing 253 fee set by the clerk in an amount not to exceed $50. For 254 purposes of this section, a case is reopened after all appeals 255 have been exhausted or time to file an appeal from a final order 256 or final judgment has expired. A reopen fee may be assessed by 257 the clerk for any motion filed by any party at least 90 days 258 after a final order or final judgment has been filed with the 259 clerk in the initial case. A reservation of jurisdiction by a 260 court does not cause a case to remain open for purposes of this 261 section or exempt a party from paying a reopen fee. A party is 262 exempt from paying the fee for any of the following: 263 1.âA writ of garnishment; 264 2.âA writ of replevin; 265 3.âA distress writ; 266 4.âA writ of attachment; 267 5.âA motion for rehearing filed within 10 days; 268 6.âA motion for attorneyâs fees filed within 30 days after 269 entry of a judgment or final order; 270 7.âA motion for dismissal filed after a mediation agreement 271 has been filed; 272 8.âA disposition of personal property without 273 administration; 274 9.âAny probate case prior to the discharge of a personal 275 representative; 276 8.10.âAny guardianship pleading prior to discharge; 277 9.11.âAny mental health pleading; 278 10.12.âMotions to withdraw by attorneys; 279 11.13.âMotions exclusively for the enforcement of child 280 support orders; 281 12.14.âA petition for credit of child support; 282 13.15.âA Notice of Intent to Relocate and any order issuing 283 as a result of an uncontested relocation; 284 14.16.âStipulations and motions to enforce stipulations; 285 15.17.âResponsive pleadings; 286 16.18.âCases in which there is no initial filing fee; or 287 17.19.âMotions for contempt. 288 (2)âUpon the institution of any appellate proceeding from 289 any lower court to the circuit court of any such county, 290 including appeals filed by a county or municipality as provided 291 in s. 34.041(5), or from the county or circuit court to an 292 appellate court of the state, the clerk shall charge and collect 293 from the party or parties instituting such appellate proceedings 294 a filing fee, as follows: 295 (b)âFor filing a notice of appeal from the county or 296 circuit court to the district court of appeal or to the Supreme 297 Court, in addition to the filing fee required under s. 25.241 or 298 s. 35.22, a filing fee not to exceed $100, of which the clerk 299 shall remit $20 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 300 the General Revenue Fund. If the party is determined to be 301 indigent, the clerk shall defer payment of the fee otherwise 302 required by this subsection. 303 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 304 28.37, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 305 28.37âFines, fees, service charges, and costs remitted to 306 the state.â 307 (4) 308 (b)âNo later than February 1, 2022, and each February 1 309 thereafter, the Department of Revenue shall transfer 50 percent 310 of The cumulative excess of the original revenue projection from 311 the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund to the General Revenue Fund. 312 The remaining 50 percent in the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund 313 may be used in the development of the total combined budgets of 314 the clerks of the court as provided in s. 28.35(2)(f)6. However, 315 a minimum of 10 percent of the clerk-retained portion of the 316 cumulative excess amount must be held in reserve until such 317 funds reach an amount equal to at least 16 percent of the total 318 budget authority from the current county fiscal year, as 319 provided in s. 28.36(3)(a). 320 Section 4.âSubsection (6) of section 40.29, Florida 321 Statutes, is amended to read: 322 40.29âPayment of due-process costs; reimbursement for 323 petitions and orders.â 324 (6)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the Florida 325 Clerks of Court Operations Corporation clerk of the circuit 326 court may, on behalf of the clerks of the circuit court, on a 327 quarterly basis, submit to the Justice Administrative Commission 328 a certified request for reimbursement to reimburse the clerks 329 for filing certain petitions, orders, appeals, and summons for 330 petitions and orders filed under ss. 394.459, 394.463, 394.467, 331 and 394.917, at the rate of $195 $40 per petition, or order, 332 appeal, or summon filed. Such request for reimbursement shall be 333 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice 334 Administrative Commission pursuant to s. 28.35(2)(i). 335 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 336 45.035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 337 45.035âClerkâs fees.âIn addition to other fees or service 338 charges authorized by law, the clerk shall receive service 339 charges related to the judicial sales procedure set forth in ss. 340 45.031-45.033 and this section: 341 (2)âIf there is a surplus resulting from the sale, the 342 clerk may receive the following service charges, which shall be 343 deducted from the surplus: 344 (b)âThe clerk is entitled to a service charge of $15 for 345 each disbursement of surplus proceeds, from which the clerk 346 shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 347 General Revenue Fund. 348 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 57.081, Florida 349 Statutes, is amended to read: 350 57.081âCosts; right to proceed where prepayment of costs 351 and payment of filing fees waived.â 352 (1)âAny indigent person, except a prisoner as defined in s. 353 57.085, who is a party or intervenor in any judicial or 354 administrative agency proceeding or who initiates such 355 proceeding shall receive the services of the courts, sheriffs, 356 and clerks, with respect to such proceedings, despite his or her 357 present inability to pay for these services. Such services are 358 limited to filing fees; service of process; certified copies of 359 orders or final judgments; a single photocopy of any court 360 pleading, record, or instrument filed with the clerk; examining 361 fees; mediation services and fees; private court-appointed 362 counsel fees; subpoena fees and services; service charges for 363 collecting and disbursing funds; and any other cost or service 364 arising out of pending litigation. In any appeal from an 365 administrative agency decision, for which the clerk is 366 responsible for preparing the transcript, the clerk shall record 367 the cost of preparing the transcripts and the cost for copies of 368 any exhibits in the record. A party who has obtained a 369 certification of indigence pursuant to s. 27.52 or s. 57.082 370 with respect to a proceeding is not required to prepay costs to 371 a court, clerk, or sheriff and is not required to pay filing 372 fees or charges for issuance of a summons. However, pursuant to 373 s. 40.29(6), the clerk may be reimbursed for filing fees and 374 charges for services provided under this subsection. 375 Section 7.âSubsection (1), paragraph (e) of subsection (2), 376 and subsection (6) of section 57.082, Florida Statutes, are 377 amended to read: 378 57.082âDetermination of civil indigent status.â 379 (1)âAPPLICATION TO THE CLERK.âA person seeking appointment 380 of an attorney in a civil case eligible for court-appointed 381 counsel, or seeking relief from payment of filing fees and 382 prepayment of costs under s. 57.081, based upon an inability to 383 pay must apply to the clerk of the court for a determination of 384 civil indigent status using an application form developed by the 385 Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation with final 386 approval by the Supreme Court. 387 (a)âThe application must include, at a minimum, the 388 following financial information: 389 1.âNet income, consisting of total salary and wages, minus 390 deductions required by law, including court-ordered support 391 payments. 392 2.âOther income, including, but not limited to, social 393 security benefits, union funds, veteransâ benefits, workersâ 394 compensation, other regular support from absent family members, 395 public or private employee pensions, reemployment assistance or 396 unemployment compensation, dividends, interest, rent, trusts, 397 and gifts. 398 3.âAssets, including, but not limited to, cash, savings 399 accounts, bank accounts, stocks, bonds, certificates of deposit, 400 equity in real estate, and equity in a boat or a motor vehicle 401 or in other tangible property. 402 4.âAll liabilities and debts. 403 404 The application must include a signature by the applicant which 405 attests to the truthfulness of the information provided. The 406 application form developed by the corporation must include 407 notice that the applicant may seek court review of a clerkâs 408 determination that the applicant is not indigent, as provided in 409 this section. 410 (b)âThe clerk shall assist a person who appears before the 411 clerk and requests assistance in completing the application, and 412 the clerk shall notify the court if a person is unable to 413 complete the application after the clerk has provided 414 assistance. 415 (c)âThe clerk shall accept an application that is signed by 416 the applicant and submitted on his or her behalf by a private 417 attorney who is representing the applicant in the applicable 418 matter. 419 (d)âA person who seeks appointment of an attorney in a 420 proceeding under chapter 39, at shelter hearings or during the 421 adjudicatory process, during the judicial review process, upon 422 the filing of a petition to terminate parental rights, or upon 423 the filing of any appeal, or if the person seeks appointment of 424 an attorney in a reopened proceeding, for which an indigent 425 person is eligible for court-appointed representation must pay a 426 $50 application fee to the clerk for each application filed. A 427 person is not required to pay more than one application fee per 428 case. However, an appeal or the reopening of a proceeding shall 429 be deemed to be a distinct case. The applicant must pay the fee 430 within 7 days after submitting the application. If the applicant 431 has not paid the fee within 7 days, the court shall enter an 432 order requiring payment, and the clerk shall pursue collection 433 under s. 28.246. The clerk shall transfer monthly all 434 application fees collected under this paragraph to the 435 Department of Revenue for deposit into the Indigent Civil 436 Defense Trust Fund, to be used as appropriated by the 437 Legislature. The clerk may retain 10 percent of application fees 438 collected monthly for administrative costs before prior to 439 remitting the remainder to the Department of Revenue. If the 440 person cannot pay the application fee, the clerk shall enroll 441 the person in a payment plan pursuant to s. 28.246. 442 (e)âPursuant to s. 40.29(6), the clerk may be reimbursed 443 for applications submitted under this subsection. 444 (2)âDETERMINATION BY THE CLERK.âThe clerk of the court 445 shall determine whether an applicant seeking such designation is 446 indigent based upon the information provided in the application 447 and the criteria prescribed in this subsection. 448 (e)âThe applicant may seek review of the clerkâs 449 determination that the applicant is not indigent in the court 450 having jurisdiction over the matter by filing a petition to 451 review the clerkâs determination of nonindigent status, for 452 which a filing fee may not be charged. However, pursuant to s. 453 40.29(6), the clerk may be reimbursed for the filing fee. If the 454 applicant seeks review of the clerkâs determination of indigent 455 status, the court shall make a final determination as provided 456 in subsection (4). 457 (6)âPROCESSING CHARGE; PAYMENT PLANS.âA person who the 458 clerk or the court determines is indigent for civil proceedings 459 under this section shall be enrolled in a payment plan under s. 460 28.246 and shall be charged a one-time administrative processing 461 charge under s. 28.24(27)(c). A monthly payment amount, 462 calculated based upon all fees and all anticipated costs, is 463 presumed to correspond to the personâs ability to pay if it does 464 not exceed 2 percent of the personâs annual net income, as 465 defined in subsection (1), divided by 12. The person may seek 466 review of the clerkâs decisions regarding a payment plan 467 established under s. 28.246 in the court having jurisdiction 468 over the matter. A case may not be impeded in any way, delayed 469 in filing, or delayed in its progress, including the final 470 hearing and order, due to nonpayment of any fees or costs by an 471 indigent person. Filing fees included in a request for 472 reimbursement waived from payment under s. 57.081 may not be 473 included in the calculation related to a payment plan 474 established under this section. 475 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (10) of section 476 318.14, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 477 318.14âNoncriminal traffic infractions; exception; 478 procedures.â 479 (10) 480 (b)âAny person cited for an offense listed in this 481 subsection shall present proof of compliance before the 482 scheduled court appearance date. For the purposes of this 483 subsection, proof of compliance shall consist of a valid, 484 renewed, or reinstated driver license or registration 485 certificate and proper proof of maintenance of security as 486 required by s. 316.646. Notwithstanding waiver of fine, any 487 person establishing proof of compliance shall be assessed court 488 costs of $25, except that a person charged with violation of s. 489 316.646(1)-(3) may be assessed court costs of $8. One dollar of 490 such costs shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 491 deposit into the Child Welfare Training Trust Fund of the 492 Department of Children and Families. One dollar of such costs 493 shall be distributed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for 494 deposit into the Juvenile Justice Training Trust Fund. Fourteen 495 dollars of such costs shall be distributed to the municipality 496 and $9, $1 shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue for 497 deposit into the General Revenue Fund and $8 shall be deposited 498 by the clerk of the court into the fine and forfeiture fund 499 established pursuant to s. 142.01, if the offense was committed 500 within the municipality. If the offense was committed in an 501 unincorporated area of a county or if the citation was for a 502 violation of s. 316.646(1)-(3), the entire amount shall be 503 deposited by the clerk of the court into the fine and forfeiture 504 fund established pursuant to s. 142.01, except for the moneys to 505 be deposited into the Child Welfare Training Trust Fund and the 506 Juvenile Justice Training Trust Fund and $3 which the clerk 507 shall remit to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 508 General Revenue Fund. This subsection does not authorize the 509 operation of a vehicle without a valid driver license, without a 510 valid vehicle tag and registration, or without the maintenance 511 of required security. 512 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 513 318.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 514 318.15âFailure to comply with civil penalty or to appear; 515 penalty.â 516 (1) 517 (b)âHowever, a person who elects to attend driver 518 improvement school and has paid the civil penalty as provided in 519 s. 318.14(9) but who subsequently fails to attend the driver 520 improvement school within the time specified by the court is 521 deemed to have admitted the infraction and shall be adjudicated 522 guilty. If the person received an 18-percent reduction pursuant 523 to s. 318.14(9), the person must pay the clerk of the court that 524 amount and a processing fee of up to $18, from which the clerk 525 shall remit $3 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 526 General Revenue Fund, after which additional penalties, court 527 costs, or surcharges may not be imposed for the violation. In 528 all other such cases, the person must pay the clerk a processing 529 fee of up to $18, from which the clerk shall remit $3 to the 530 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, 531 after which additional penalties, court costs, or surcharges may 532 not be imposed for the violation. The clerk of the court shall 533 notify the department of the personâs failure to attend driver 534 improvement school and points shall be assessed pursuant to s. 535 322.27. 536 Section 10.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2), 537 paragraph (d) of subsection (3), paragraph (a) of subsection 538 (8), and paragraph (a) of subsection (12) of section 318.18, 539 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 540 318.18âAmount of penalties.âThe penalties required for a 541 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal 542 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows: 543 (2)âThirty dollars for all nonmoving traffic violations 544 and: 545 (b)âFor all violations of ss. 320.0605, 320.07(1), 322.065, 546 and 322.15(1). Any person who is cited for a violation of s. 547 320.07(1) shall be charged a delinquent fee pursuant to s. 548 320.07(4). 549 1.âIf a person who is cited for a violation of s. 320.0605 550 or s. 320.07 can show proof of having a valid registration at 551 the time of arrest, the clerk of the court may dismiss the case 552 and may assess a dismissal fee of up to $10, from which the 553 clerk shall retain remit $2.50 to the Department of Revenue for 554 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. A person who finds it 555 impossible or impractical to obtain a valid registration 556 certificate must submit an affidavit detailing the reasons for 557 the impossibility or impracticality. The reasons may include, 558 but are not limited to, the fact that the vehicle was sold, 559 stolen, or destroyed; that the state in which the vehicle is 560 registered does not issue a certificate of registration; or that 561 the vehicle is owned by another person. 562 2.âIf a person who is cited for a violation of s. 322.03, 563 s. 322.065, or s. 322.15 can show a driver license issued to him 564 or her and valid at the time of arrest, the clerk of the court 565 may dismiss the case and may assess a dismissal fee of up to 566 $10, from which the clerk shall retain remit $2.50 to the 567 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 568 3.âIf a person who is cited for a violation of s. 316.646 569 can show proof of security as required by s. 627.733, issued to 570 the person and valid at the time of arrest, the clerk of the 571 court may dismiss the case and may assess a dismissal fee of up 572 to $10, from which the clerk shall retain remit $2.50 to the 573 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 574 A person who finds it impossible or impractical to obtain proof 575 of security must submit an affidavit detailing the reasons for 576 the impracticality. The reasons may include, but are not limited 577 to, the fact that the vehicle has since been sold, stolen, or 578 destroyed; that the owner or registrant of the vehicle is not 579 required by s. 627.733 to maintain personal injury protection 580 insurance; or that the vehicle is owned by another person. 581 (c)âFor all violations of ss. 316.2935 and 316.610. 582 However, for a violation of s. 316.2935 or s. 316.610, if the 583 person committing the violation corrects the defect and obtains 584 proof of such timely repair by an affidavit of compliance 585 executed by the law enforcement agency within 30 days from the 586 date upon which the traffic citation was issued, and pays $4 to 587 the law enforcement agency, thereby completing the affidavit of 588 compliance, then upon presentation of said affidavit by the 589 defendant to the clerk within the 30-day time period set forth 590 under s. 318.14(4), the fine must be reduced to $10, which the 591 clerk of the court shall retain and from which the clerk shall 592 remit $2.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 593 General Revenue Fund. 594 (3) 595 (d)1.âNotwithstanding paragraphs (b) and (c), a person 596 cited for a violation of s. 316.1895(10) or s. 316.183 for 597 exceeding the speed limit in force at the time of the violation 598 on a roadway maintained as a school zone as provided in s. 599 316.1895, when enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement 600 officer pursuant to s. 316.1896, must pay a fine of $100. Fines 601 collected under this paragraph must be distributed as follows: 602 a.âTwenty dollars must be deposited by the clerk into 603 remitted to the fine and forfeiture fund established pursuant to 604 s. 142.01 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 605 Revenue Fund. 606 b.âSeventy-seven dollars must be distributed to the county 607 for any violations occurring in any unincorporated areas of the 608 county or to the municipality for any violations occurring in 609 the incorporated boundaries of the municipality in which the 610 infraction occurred, to be used as provided in s. 316.1896(5). 611 c.âThree dollars must be remitted to the Department of 612 Revenue for deposit into the Department of Law Enforcement 613 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Trust Fund to be used as 614 provided in s. 943.25. 615 2.âIf a person who is mailed a notice of violation or a 616 uniform traffic citation for a violation of s. 316.1895(10) or 617 s. 316.183, as enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement 618 officer under s. 316.1896, presents documentation from the 619 appropriate governmental entity that the notice of violation or 620 uniform traffic citation was in error, the clerk of court or 621 clerk to the local hearing officer may dismiss the case. The 622 clerk of court or clerk to the local hearing officer may not 623 charge for this service. 624 (8)(a)âAny person who fails to comply with the courtâs 625 requirements or who fails to pay the civil penalties specified 626 in this section within the 30-day period provided for in s. 627 318.14 must pay an additional civil penalty of $16, $6.50 of 628 which must be deposited by the clerk into remitted to the fine 629 and forfeiture fund established pursuant to s. 142.01 Department 630 of Revenue for deposit in the General Revenue Fund, and $9.50 of 631 which must be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit 632 in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. Of this additional 633 civil penalty of $16, $4 is not revenue for purposes of s. 28.36 634 and may not be used in establishing the budget of the clerk of 635 the court under that section or s. 28.35. The department shall 636 contract with the Florida Association of Court Clerks, Inc., to 637 design, establish, operate, upgrade, and maintain an automated 638 statewide Uniform Traffic Citation Accounting System to be 639 operated by the clerks of the court which shall include, but not 640 be limited to, the accounting for traffic infractions by type, a 641 record of the disposition of the citations, and an accounting 642 system for the fines assessed and the subsequent fine amounts 643 paid to the clerks of the court. The clerks of the court must 644 provide the information required by this chapter to be 645 transmitted to the department by electronic transmission 646 pursuant to the contract. 647 (12)(a)âIn addition to the stated fine, court costs must be 648 paid in the following amounts and shall be deposited by the 649 clerk into the fine and forfeiture fund established pursuant to 650 s. 142.01 except as provided in this paragraph: 651 1.âFor pedestrian infractions: $4, from which the clerk 652 shall remit $1 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 653 General Revenue Fund. 654 2.âFor nonmoving traffic infractions: $18, from which the 655 clerk shall remit $2 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 656 into the General Revenue Fund. 657 3.âFor moving traffic infractions: $35, from which the 658 clerk shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for deposit 659 into the General Revenue Fund. 660 Section 11.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 661 318.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 662 318.21âDisposition of civil penalties by county courts.âAll 663 civil penalties received by a county court pursuant to the 664 provisions of this chapter shall be distributed and paid monthly 665 as follows: 666 (2)âOf the remainder: 667 (g)1.âIf the violation occurred within a special 668 improvement district of the Seminole Indian Tribe or Miccosukee 669 Indian Tribe, 56.4 percent shall be paid to that special 670 improvement district. 671 2.âIf the violation occurred within a municipality, 28.2 672 50.8 percent shall be paid to that municipality and 28.2 5.6 673 percent shall be deposited into the fine and forfeiture trust 674 fund established pursuant to s. 142.01. 675 3.âIf the violation occurred within the unincorporated area 676 of a county, including the unincorporated areas, if any, of a 677 government created pursuant to s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the State 678 Constitution, that is not within a special improvement district 679 of the Seminole Indian Tribe or Miccosukee Indian Tribe, 56.4 680 percent shall be deposited into the fine and forfeiture fund 681 established pursuant to s. 142.01. 682 Section 12.âSubsection (1) of section 322.245, Florida 683 Statutes, is amended to read: 684 322.245âSuspension of license upon failure of person 685 charged with specified offense under chapter 316, chapter 320, 686 or this chapter to comply with directives ordered by traffic 687 court or upon failure to pay child support in non-IV-D cases as 688 provided in chapter 61 or failure to pay any financial 689 obligation in any other criminal case.â 690 (1)âIf a person charged with a violation of any of the 691 criminal offenses enumerated in s. 318.17 or with the commission 692 of any offense constituting a misdemeanor under chapter 320 or 693 this chapter fails to comply with all of the directives of the 694 court within the time allotted by the court, the clerk of the 695 court must provide the person, either electronically or by mail 696 sent to the address specified on the uniform traffic citation, a 697 notice of such failure, notifying him or her that, if he or she 698 does not comply with the directives of the court within 30 days 699 after the date of the notice and pay a delinquency fee of up to 700 $25 to the clerk, from which the clerk shall deposit remit $10 701 into to the fine and forfeiture fund established pursuant to s. 702 142.01 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General 703 Revenue Fund, his or her driver license will be suspended. The 704 notice must be sent no later than 5 days after such failure. The 705 delinquency fee may be retained by the office of the clerk to 706 defray the operating costs of the office. 707 Section 13.âParagraph (d) of subsection (8) of section 708 394.459, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 709 394.459âRights of patients.â 710 (8)âHABEAS CORPUS.â 711 (d)âA no fee may not shall be charged for the filing of a 712 petition under this subsection. However, pursuant to s. 713 40.29(6), the clerk may be reimbursed for filing the petition. 714 Section 14.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 715 394.463, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 716 394.463âInvoluntary examination.â 717 (2)âINVOLUNTARY EXAMINATION.â 718 (a)âAn involuntary examination may be initiated by any one 719 of the following means: 720 1.âA circuit or county court may enter an ex parte order 721 stating that a person appears to meet the criteria for 722 involuntary examination and specifying the findings on which 723 that conclusion is based. The ex parte order for involuntary 724 examination must be based on written or oral sworn testimony 725 that includes specific facts that support the findings. If other 726 less restrictive means are not available, such as voluntary 727 appearance for outpatient evaluation, a law enforcement officer, 728 or other designated agent of the court, must take the person 729 into custody and deliver him or her to an appropriate, or the 730 nearest, facility within the designated receiving system 731 pursuant to s. 394.462 for involuntary examination. The order of 732 the court must be made a part of the patientâs clinical record. 733 A fee may not be charged for the filing of an order under this 734 subsection. However, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), the clerk of the 735 court may be reimbursed for filing the order. A facility 736 accepting the patient based on this order must send a copy of 737 the order to the department within 5 working days. Within 6 738 hours after the court issues an order, the clerk of the court 739 shall electronically submit the order to the sheriff or a law 740 enforcement agency in the county where the order is to be 741 served. The order is valid only until the person is delivered to 742 the facility or for the period specified in the order itself, 743 whichever comes first. If a time limit is not specified in the 744 order, the order is valid for 7 days after the date that the 745 order was signed. 746 2.âA law enforcement officer may take a person who appears 747 to meet the criteria for involuntary examination into custody 748 and deliver the person or have him or her delivered to an 749 appropriate, or the nearest, facility within the designated 750 receiving system pursuant to s. 394.462 for examination. A law 751 enforcement officer transporting a person pursuant to this 752 section shall restrain the person in the least restrictive 753 manner available and appropriate under the circumstances. If 754 transporting a minor and the parent or legal guardian of the 755 minor is present, before departing, the law enforcement officer 756 must provide the parent or legal guardian of the minor with the 757 name, address, and contact information for the facility within 758 the designated receiving system to which the law enforcement 759 officer is transporting the minor, subject to any safety and 760 welfare concerns for the minor. The officer shall execute a 761 written report detailing the circumstances under which the 762 person was taken into custody, which must be made a part of the 763 patientâs clinical record. The report must include all emergency 764 contact information for the person that is readily accessible to 765 the law enforcement officer, including information available 766 through electronic databases maintained by the Department of Law 767 Enforcement or by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 768 Vehicles. Such emergency contact information may be used by a 769 receiving facility only for the purpose of informing listed 770 emergency contacts of a patientâs whereabouts pursuant to s. 771 119.0712(2)(d). Any facility accepting the patient based on this 772 report must send a copy of the report to the department within 5 773 working days. 774 3.âA physician, a physician assistant, a clinical 775 psychologist, a psychiatric nurse, an advanced practice 776 registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123, a mental health 777 counselor, a marriage and family therapist, or a clinical social 778 worker may execute a certificate stating that he or she has 779 examined a person within the preceding 48 hours and finds that 780 the person appears to meet the criteria for involuntary 781 examination and stating the observations upon which that 782 conclusion is based. If other less restrictive means, such as 783 voluntary appearance for outpatient evaluation, are not 784 available, a law enforcement officer must take into custody the 785 person named in the certificate and deliver him or her to the 786 appropriate, or nearest, facility within the designated 787 receiving system pursuant to s. 394.462 for involuntary 788 examination. The law enforcement officer shall execute a written 789 report detailing the circumstances under which the person was 790 taken into custody and include all emergency contact information 791 required under subparagraph 2. Such emergency contact 792 information may be used by a receiving facility only for the 793 purpose of informing listed emergency contacts of a patientâs 794 whereabouts pursuant to s. 119.0712(2)(d). The report and 795 certificate must be made a part of the patientâs clinical 796 record. Any facility accepting the patient based on this 797 certificate must send a copy of the certificate to the 798 department within 5 working days. The document may be submitted 799 electronically through existing data systems, if applicable. 800 801 When sending the order, report, or certificate to the 802 department, a facility shall, at a minimum, provide information 803 about which action was taken regarding the patient under 804 paragraph (g), which information must also be made a part of the 805 patientâs clinical record. 806 Section 15.âParagraph (f) of subsection (4) of section 807 394.467, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 808 394.467âInvoluntary inpatient placement and involuntary 809 outpatient services.â 810 (4)âPETITION FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVICES.â 811 (f)âWhen the petition has been filed, the clerk of the 812 court shall provide copies of the petition and the recommended 813 services plan, if applicable, to the department, the managing 814 entity, the patient, the patientâs guardian or representative, 815 the state attorney, and the public defender or the patientâs 816 private counsel. A fee may not be charged for the filing of a 817 petition under this subsection. However, pursuant to s. 818 40.29(6), the clerk of the court may be reimbursed for filing 819 the petition. 820 Section 16.âSection 394.914, Florida Statutes, is amended 821 to read: 822 394.914âPetition; contents.âAfter receipt from the 823 multidisciplinary team of the written assessment and positive or 824 negative recommendation as to whether the person meets the 825 definition of a sexually violent predator, the state attorney, 826 in accordance with s. 394.913, may file a petition with the 827 circuit court alleging that the person is a sexually violent 828 predator and stating facts sufficient to support such 829 allegation. A fee may not be charged for the filing of a 830 petition under this section. However, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), 831 the clerk of the circuit court may be reimbursed for filing the 832 petition. 833 Section 17.âSubsection (3) of section 394.917, Florida 834 Statutes, is amended to read: 835 394.917âDetermination; commitment procedure; mistrials; 836 housing; counsel and costs in indigent appellate cases.â 837 (3)âThe public defender of the circuit in which a person 838 was determined to be a sexually violent predator shall be 839 appointed to represent the person on appeal. That public 840 defender may request the public defender who handles criminal 841 appeals for the circuit to represent the person on appeal in the 842 manner provided in s. 27.51(4). If the public defender is unable 843 to represent the person on appeal due to a conflict, the court 844 shall appoint other counsel, who shall be compensated at a rate 845 not less than that provided for appointed counsel in criminal 846 cases. Filing fees for indigent appeals under this section act 847 are waived. However, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), the clerk of the 848 circuit court may be reimbursed for filing the appeal. Costs and 849 fees related to such appeals, including the amounts paid for 850 records, transcripts, and compensation of appointed counsel, 851 shall be authorized by the trial court and paid from state funds 852 that are appropriated for such purposes. 853 Section 18.âSubsection (1) of section 397.681, Florida 854 Statutes, is amended to read: 855 397.681âInvoluntary petitions; general provisions; court 856 jurisdiction and right to counsel.â 857 (1)âJURISDICTION.âThe courts have jurisdiction of 858 involuntary treatment petitions for substance abuse impaired 859 persons, and such petitions must be filed with the clerk of the 860 court in the county where the person is located. The clerk of 861 the court may not charge a fee for the filing of a petition 862 under this section, but, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), may be 863 reimbursed for filing the petition. The chief judge may appoint 864 a general or special magistrate to preside over all or part of 865 the proceedings. The alleged impaired person is named as the 866 respondent. 867 Section 19.âSubsection (3) of section 721.83, Florida 868 Statutes, is amended to read: 869 721.83âConsolidation of judicial foreclosure actions.â 870 (3)âA consolidated timeshare foreclosure action shall be 871 considered a single action, suit, or proceeding for the payment 872 of filing fees and service charges pursuant to general law. In 873 addition to the payment of such filing fees and service charges, 874 an additional filing fee of up to $10, from which the clerk 875 shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 876 General Revenue Fund, for each timeshare interest joined in that 877 action shall be paid to the clerk of court. 878 Section 20.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 879 741.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 880 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 881 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 882 injunction; issuance of injunction; statewide verification 883 system; enforcement; public records exemption.â 884 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the assessment of a 885 filing fee for a petition for protection against domestic 886 violence is prohibited. However, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), the 887 clerk of the court may be reimbursed for filing the petition 888 subject to legislative appropriation, the clerk of the circuit 889 court may, on a quarterly basis, submit to the Justice 890 Administrative Commission a certified request for reimbursement 891 for petitions for protection against domestic violence issued by 892 the court, at the rate of $40 per petition. The request for 893 reimbursement must be submitted in the form and manner 894 prescribed by the Justice Administrative Commission. From this 895 reimbursement, the clerk shall pay any law enforcement agency 896 serving the injunction the fee requested by the law enforcement 897 agency; however, this fee may not exceed $20. 898 Section 21.âSubsection (4) of section 744.3678, Florida 899 Statutes, is amended to read: 900 744.3678âAnnual accounting.â 901 (4)âThe guardian shall pay from the wardâs estate to the 902 clerk of the circuit court a fee based upon the following 903 graduated fee schedule, upon the filing of the annual financial 904 return, for the auditing of the return: 905 (a)âFor estates with a value of $25,000 or less the clerk 906 of the court may charge a fee of up to $20, from which the clerk 907 shall remit $5 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 908 General Revenue Fund. 909 (b)âFor estates with a value of more than $25,000 up to and 910 including $100,000 the clerk of the court may charge a fee of up 911 to $85, from which the clerk shall remit $10 to the Department 912 of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 913 (c)âFor estates with a value of more than $100,000 up to 914 and including $500,000 the clerk of the court may charge a fee 915 of up to $170, from which the clerk shall remit $20 to the 916 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 917 (d)âFor estates with a value in excess of $500,000 the 918 clerk of the court may charge a fee of up to $250, from which 919 the clerk shall remit $25 to the Department of Revenue for 920 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 921 922 Upon petition by the guardian, the court may waive the auditing 923 fee upon a showing of insufficient funds in the wardâs estate. 924 Any guardian unable to pay the auditing fee may petition the 925 court for a waiver of the fee. The court may waive the fee after 926 it has reviewed the documentation filed by the guardian in 927 support of the waiver. 928 Section 22.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 929 784.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 930 784.046âAction by victim of repeat violence, sexual 931 violence, or dating violence for protective injunction; dating 932 violence investigations, notice to victims, and reporting; 933 pretrial release violations; public records exemption.â 934 (3) 935 (b)âNotwithstanding any other law, the clerk of the court 936 may not assess a fee for filing a petition for protection 937 against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, 938 but, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), may be reimbursed for filing the 939 petition. However, subject to legislative appropriation, the 940 clerk of the court may, each quarter, submit to the Justice 941 Administrative Commission a certified request for reimbursement 942 for petitions for protection issued by the court under this 943 section at the rate of $40 per petition. The request for 944 reimbursement must be submitted in the form and manner 945 prescribed by the Justice Administrative Commission. From this 946 reimbursement, the clerk shall pay the law enforcement agency 947 serving the injunction the fee requested by the law enforcement 948 agency; however, this fee may not exceed $20. 949 Section 23.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 950 784.0485, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 951 784.0485âStalking; injunction; powers and duties of court 952 and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary injunction; 953 issuance of injunction; statewide verification system; 954 enforcement.â 955 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the clerk of court 956 may not assess a filing fee to file a petition for protection 957 against stalking, but, pursuant to s. 40.29(6), may be 958 reimbursed for filing the petition. However, subject to 959 legislative appropriation, the clerk of the circuit court may, 960 on a quarterly basis, submit to the Justice Administrative 961 Commission a certified request for reimbursement for petitions 962 for protection against stalking issued by the court, at the rate 963 of $40 per petition. The request for reimbursement must be 964 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice 965 Administrative Commission. From this reimbursement, the clerk 966 shall pay any law enforcement agency serving the injunction the 967 fee requested by the law enforcement agency; however, this fee 968 may not exceed $20. 969 Section 24.âParagraph (i) of subsection (4) of section 970 825.1035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 971 825.1035âInjunction for protection against exploitation of 972 a vulnerable adult.â 973 (4)âCLERKâS DUTIES, RESPONSIBILITIES, AND CHARGES.â 974 (i)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, the clerk 975 of the circuit court may not assess an initial filing fee or 976 service charge for petitions filed under this section, but, 977 pursuant to s. 40.29(6), may be reimbursed for filing the 978 petition. However, subject to legislative appropriation, the 979 clerk of the circuit court may, on a quarterly basis, submit a 980 certified request for reimbursement to the Justice 981 Administrative Commission for the processing of such petitions, 982 at the rate of $40 per petition. The request for reimbursement 983 must be submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the 984 Justice Administrative Commission. From each reimbursement 985 received, the clerk of the circuit court shall pay any law 986 enforcement agency serving the injunction for protection against 987 exploitation of a vulnerable adult the fee requested by the law 988 enforcement agency, to not exceed $20. 989 Section 25.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 990 938.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 991 938.05âAdditional court costs for felonies, misdemeanors, 992 and criminal traffic offenses.â 993 (1)âAny person pleading nolo contendere to a misdemeanor or 994 criminal traffic offense under s. 318.14(10)(a) or pleading 995 guilty or nolo contendere to, or being found guilty of, any 996 felony, misdemeanor, or criminal traffic offense under the laws 997 of this state or the violation of any municipal or county 998 ordinance which adopts by reference any misdemeanor under state 999 law, shall pay as a cost in the case, in addition to any other 1000 cost required to be imposed by law, a sum in accordance with the 1001 following schedule: 1002 (c)âCriminal traffic offenses: $60, from which the clerk 1003 shall deposit remit $10 into to the fine and forfeiture fund 1004 established pursuant to s. 142.01 Department of Revenue for 1005 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 1006 Section 26.âParagraphs (f) and (i) of subsection (2) of 1007 section 28.35, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1008 28.35âFlorida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation.â 1009 (2)âThe duties of the corporation shall include the 1010 following: 1011 (f)âApproving the proposed budgets submitted by clerks of 1012 the court pursuant to s. 28.36. The corporation must ensure that 1013 the total combined budgets of the clerks of the court do not 1014 exceed the total estimated revenues from fees, service charges, 1015 court costs, and fines for court-related functions available for 1016 court-related expenditures as determined by the most recent 1017 Revenue Estimating Conference, plus the total of unspent 1018 budgeted funds for court-related functions carried forward by 1019 the clerks of the court from the previous county fiscal year, 1020 plus the cumulative excess as provided in balance of funds 1021 remaining in the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund after the 1022 transfer of funds to the General Revenue Fund required pursuant 1023 to s. 28.37(4)(b), and plus any appropriations for court-related 1024 functions. The corporation may amend any individual clerk of the 1025 court budget to ensure compliance with this paragraph and must 1026 consider performance measures, workload performance standards, 1027 workload measures, and expense data before modifying the budget. 1028 As part of this process, the corporation shall: 1029 1.âCalculate the minimum amount of revenue necessary for 1030 each clerk of the court to efficiently perform the list of 1031 court-related functions specified in paragraph (3)(a). The 1032 corporation shall apply the workload measures appropriate for 1033 determining the individual level of review required to fund the 1034 clerkâs budget. 1035 2.âPrepare a cost comparison of similarly situated clerks 1036 of the court, based on county population and numbers of filings, 1037 using the standard list of court-related functions specified in 1038 paragraph (3)(a). 1039 3.âConduct an annual base budget review and an annual 1040 budget exercise examining the total budget of each clerk of the 1041 court. The review shall examine revenues from all sources, 1042 expenses of court-related functions, and expenses of noncourt 1043 related functions as necessary to determine that court-related 1044 revenues are not being used for noncourt-related purposes. The 1045 review and exercise shall identify potential targeted budget 1046 reductions in the percentage amount provided in Schedule VIII-B 1047 of the stateâs previous yearâs legislative budget instructions, 1048 as referenced in s. 216.023(3), or an equivalent schedule or 1049 instruction as may be adopted by the Legislature. 1050 4.âIdentify those proposed budgets containing funding for 1051 items not included on the standard list of court-related 1052 functions specified in paragraph (3)(a). 1053 5.âIdentify those clerks projected to have court-related 1054 revenues insufficient to fund their anticipated court-related 1055 expenditures. 1056 6.âUse revenue estimates based on the official estimate for 1057 funds from fees, service charges, court costs, and fines for 1058 court-related functions accruing to the clerks of the court made 1059 by the Revenue Estimating Conference, as well as any unspent 1060 budgeted funds for court-related functions carried forward by 1061 the clerks of the court from the previous county fiscal year and 1062 the cumulative excess as provided in balance of funds remaining 1063 in the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund after the transfer of 1064 funds to the General Revenue Fund required pursuant to s. 1065 28.37(4)(b), plus any appropriations for the purpose of funding 1066 court-related functions. 1067 7.âIdentify pay and benefit increases in any proposed clerk 1068 budget, including, but not limited to, cost of living increases, 1069 merit increases, and bonuses. 1070 8.âIdentify increases in anticipated expenditures in any 1071 clerk budget that exceeds the current year budget by more than 3 1072 percent. 1073 9.âIdentify the budget of any clerk which exceeds the 1074 average budget of similarly situated clerks by more than 10 1075 percent. 1076 1077 For the purposes of this paragraph, the term âunspent budgeted 1078 funds for court-related functionsâ means undisbursed funds 1079 included in the clerks of the courts budgets for court-related 1080 functions established pursuant to this section and s. 28.36. 1081 (i)âAnnually preparing a budget request which, 1082 notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 216 and in accordance 1083 with s. 216.351, provides the anticipated amount necessary for 1084 reimbursement pursuant to s. 40.29(6) ss. 40.29(6), 1085 741.30(2)(a), 784.046(3)(b), 784.0485(2)(a), and 825.1035(4)(i). 1086 The request for the anticipated reimbursement amount must be 1087 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice 1088 Administrative Commission. Such request is not subject to change 1089 by the Justice Administrative Commission, except for technical 1090 changes necessary to conform to the legislative budget 1091 instructions, and must be submitted to the Governor for 1092 transmittal to the Legislature. 1093 Section 27.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection 1094 (3) of section 28.36, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1095 28.36âBudget procedure.âThere is established a budget 1096 procedure for the court-related functions of the clerks of the 1097 court. 1098 (2)âEach proposed budget shall further conform to the 1099 following requirements: 1100 (b)âThe proposed budget must be balanced such that the 1101 total of the estimated revenues available equals or exceeds the 1102 total of the anticipated expenditures. Such revenues include 1103 revenue projected to be received from fees, service charges, 1104 court costs, and fines for court-related functions during the 1105 fiscal period covered by the budget, plus the total of unspent 1106 budgeted funds for court-related functions carried forward by 1107 the clerk of the court from the previous county fiscal year and 1108 the cumulative excess as provided in plus the portion of the 1109 balance of funds remaining in the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund 1110 after the transfer of funds to the General Revenue Fund required 1111 pursuant to s. 28.37(4)(b) which has been allocated to each 1112 respective clerk of the court by the Florida Clerks of Court 1113 Operations Corporation. For the purposes of this paragraph, the 1114 term âunspent budgeted funds for court-related functionsâ means 1115 undisbursed funds included in the clerk of the courtsâ budget 1116 for court related functions established pursuant to s. 28.35 and 1117 this section. The anticipated expenditures must be itemized as 1118 required by the corporation. 1119 (3)(a)âThe Florida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation 1120 shall establish and manage a reserve for contingencies within 1121 the Clerks of the Court Trust Fund which must consist of an 1122 amount not to exceed 16 percent of the total budget authority 1123 for the clerks of court during the current county fiscal year, 1124 to be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year. Funds to be 1125 held in reserve include the transfers of cumulative excess, as 1126 provided in s. 28.37(4)(b), from the Clerks of the Court Trust 1127 Fund and may also include revenues provided by law or moneys 1128 appropriated by the Legislature. 1129 Section 28.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1130 142.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1131 142.01âFine and forfeiture fund; disposition of revenue; 1132 clerk of the circuit court.â 1133 (1)(a)âThere shall be established by the clerk of the 1134 circuit court in each county of this state a separate fund to be 1135 known as the fine and forfeiture fund for use by the clerk of 1136 the circuit court in performing court-related functions. The 1137 fund shall consist of the following: 1138 1.âFines and penalties pursuant to ss. 28.2402(2), 1139 34.045(2), 316.193, 322.245(1), 327.35, 327.72, 379.2203(1), and 1140 775.083(1). 1141 2.âThat portion of civil penalties directed to this fund 1142 pursuant to s. 318.21. 1143 3.âCourt costs pursuant to ss. 28.2402(1)(b), 34.045(1)(b), 1144 318.14(10)(b), 318.15(1)(b), 318.18(12)(a), 327.73(9)(a) and 1145 (11)(a), and 938.05(1)(c) and (3) 938.05(3). 1146 4.âProceeds from forfeited bail bonds, unclaimed bonds, 1147 unclaimed moneys, or recognizances pursuant to ss. 321.05(4)(a), 1148 379.2203(1), and 903.26(3)(a). 1149 5.âFines and forfeitures pursuant to s. 34.191. 1150 6.âFiling fees received pursuant to ss. 28.241 and 34.041, 1151 unless the disposition of such fees is otherwise required by 1152 law. 1153 7.âAll other revenues received by the clerk as revenue 1154 authorized by law to be retained by the clerk. 1155 Section 29.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.